Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-816
Actions; consolidation; intervention.

If several actions brought to enforce liens under the provisions of sections 57-801 to 57-820 on the same property be pending at the same time, the court may order them to be consolidated. Any claimant having filed his statement of lien as provided by the provisions of sections 57-801 to 57-820 shall be entitled to intervene in any pending action brought to enforce a lien on the same property.

Laws 1957, c. 241, § 16, p. 814.